Massachusetts, session 194th, H5247.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of
Maynard may enact and enforce local regulations, by-laws or ordinances prohibiting or
restricting the use of second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides within the boundaries of the
town , including but not limited to their use on public and private properties.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1